Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 25 Articles of Bedding

31-25-1 through 31-25-13.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 719, §§ 1-7, 9, 11, 13; Code 1933, §§ 88-801—88-817, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 503; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94 § 31; repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1339, § 1, effective July 1, 1997.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1339, § 1 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 1997.